District of Columbia statutes.
1-607.08

Specific standards authorized.

Specific standards to carry out the purposes of this subchapter shall be adopted by the Mayor.

History

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 708, 25 DCR 5740

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-607.8.
1973 Ed., § 1-337.8.